Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-606
Department of Banking and Finance; costs of extra examination or investigation of financial institution or entity; billing; travel costs.

(1) In case an extra examination or an investigation of any financial institution or entity becomes necessary and is made pursuant to the laws specified in section 8-601, the costs thereof shall be paid by the financial institution or entity examined or investigated.

(2) In the case of a financial institution or entity organized under the law of a state other than this state or a financial institution or entity organized under the law of this state but which maintains an office in another state or states, travel expenses involved in conducting an examination or investigation may also be billed to the financial institution or entity, if the examination or investigation involves travel outside this state.

Laws 2007, LB124, § 13;

Laws 2026, LB836, § 6.
July 18, 2026